Florida, session 2026, SB1552.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 58 59 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âPromising Pathways 60 Act.â 61 Section 2.âSection 499.0295, Florida Statutes, is amended 62 to read: 63 (Substantial rewording of section. See 64 s. 499.0295, F.S., for present text.) 65 499.0295âExperimental treatments for terminal conditions 66 and life-threatening rare diseases.â 67 (1)âThe Legislature finds that residents of this state with 68 terminal conditions and life-threatening rare diseases may 69 benefit from access to experimental treatments that have 70 demonstrated initial human safety but are not yet approved by 71 the United States Food and Drug Administration. 72 (2)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to: 73 (a)âCreate a safe, regulated, and transparent pathway to 74 experimental treatments through licensed state institutions with 75 board oversight. 76 (b)âCondition payment on evidence development. 77 (c)âEncourage coverage parity by state-regulated health 78 plans. 79 (d)âAlign temporary pricing during the conditional period 80 with the maturity of clinical evidence. 81 (3)âAs used in this section, the term: 82 (a)ââBoardâ means the Board of Medicine, created under 83 chapter 458, or the Board of Osteopathic Medicine, created under 84 chapter 459, as applicable. 85 (b)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Health, created 86 under s. 20.43. 87 (c)ââEligible facilityâ means a hospital or health care 88 facility licensed under chapter 395 that operates under the 89 federal policy for the protection of human subjects under 45 90 C.F.R. part 46 and maintains, or participates under, 91 Institutional Review Board oversight for experimental 92 treatments. 93 (d)ââEligible patientâ means a person who: 94 1.a.âHas a terminal condition that is attested to by the 95 treating physician and confirmed by a board-certified physician 96 in an appropriate specialty for that condition; or 97 b.âHas a life-threatening rare disease that is attested to 98 by the treating physician and confirmed by a board-certified 99 physician in an appropriate specialty. 100 2.âHas considered and exhausted all other treatment options 101 for the terminal condition or life-threatening rare disease 102 currently approved by the United States Food and Drug 103 Administration. 104 3.âHas given written informed consent pursuant to paragraph 105 (4)(c). 106 4.âHas documentation from the treating physician that the 107 patient meets the requirements of this paragraph. 108 (e)ââExperimental treatmentâ means: 109 1.âA drug, biological product, or medical device that has 110 successfully completed phase 1 of a clinical trial but has not 111 been approved for general use by the United States Food and Drug 112 Administration (FDA) and remains under investigation in a 113 clinical trial approved by the FDA; or 114 2.âPersonalized treatment for use by a patient based on his 115 or her genomic or molecular profile, including, but not limited 116 to, gene-targeted therapies, antisense oligonucleotides (ASOs) 117 mediated therapies, and neoantigen-targeting personalized cancer 118 vaccines (PCVs), which have not been approved for general use by 119 the FDA and remain under investigation in a clinical trial 120 approved by the FDA. 121 (f)ââInstitutional Review Boardâ or âIRBâ has the same 122 meaning as in s. 381.86. 123 (g)ââPatient registryâ or âregistryâ means a clinical data 124 collections system from which health information is collected at 125 specific points during the course of treatment and all personal 126 identifiers have been removed or obscured to protect patient 127 privacy. 128 (h)ââRare life-threatening diseaseâ means a progressive 129 disease or medical or surgical condition that affects less than 130 200,000 persons in the United States. The term includes any 131 progressive disease or medical or surgical condition that meets 132 the criteria of a rare disease under 21 U.S.C. s. 360bb. 133 (i)ââTerminal conditionâ means a progressive disease or 134 medical or surgical condition that causes significant functional 135 impairment, is not considered by a treating physician to be 136 reversible even with the administration of available treatment 137 options currently approved by the FDA, and, without the 138 administration of life-sustaining procedures, will result in 139 death within 1 year after diagnosis if the condition runs its 140 normal course. 141 (4)(a)âA physician licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 142 459 may prescribe to an eligible patient an experimental 143 treatment pursuant to this section. 144 (b)1.âAn eligible facility may administer to an eligible 145 patient an experimental treatment if such treatment is 146 administered pursuant to a platform or master protocol approved 147 by an IRB pursuant to subsection (5) and complies with the 148 registry requirements established in subsection (6). 149 2.a.âAn eligible facility that does not maintain its own 150 IRB may establish and maintain an affiliation with another 151 eligible facility that maintains IRB oversight. 152 b.âThe department shall adopt rules for affiliations 153 pursuant to this subparagraph, to include, but not be limited 154 to, the handling of drugs, adverse-event escalation, quality 155 assurance, and health data submission. 156 (c)âWritten informed consent, signed by an eligible 157 patient, a court-appointed guardian for an eligible patient, or 158 a health care surrogate designated by an eligible patient, is 159 required, and must include: 160 1.âAn explanation of the currently approved treatments for 161 the patientâs terminal condition or life-threatening rare 162 disease and that such treatments have been considered and 163 exhausted. 164 2.âIdentification of the specific experimental treatment 165 that the patient is seeking to use. 166 3.âA description of the potential risks and benefits of 167 using the experimental treatment, including best-case outcome 168 and worst-case outcome. The description must be based on the 169 physicianâs knowledge of the experimental treatment for the 170 patientâs terminal condition or life-threatening rare disease. 171 4.âA statement that the patientâs health plan or third 172 party administrator and physician are not obligated to pay for 173 care or treatment consequent to the use of the experimental 174 treatment unless required to do so by law or contract. 175 5.âA statement that the patientâs eligibility for hospice 176 care may be affected by the use of experimental treatment. 177 6.âA statement that the patient understands he or she is 178 liable for all expenses consequent to the use of the 179 experimental treatment but that liability does not extend to the 180 patientâs estate, unless a contract between the patient and the 181 manufacturer states otherwise. 182 7.âAn authorization from the patient to release his or her 183 health information, collected at specific points during 184 treatment, for submission into the registry established in 185 subsection (6). 186 (5)âA platform or master protocol must be approved by an 187 IRB under which treating physicians and eligible facilities may 188 adapt dosing, sequencing, or combinations of authorized 189 experimental treatments, within predefined limitations, without 190 seeking approval of an IRB for each adaptation. The platform or 191 master protocol must specify safety limits, stopping 192 requirements, and patient registry information pursuant to 193 subsection (6). 194 (6)(a)âThe department shall establish and maintain a 195 patient registry for the collection and analysis of experimental 196 treatment outcomes under this section. Eligible facilities shall 197 submit health information to the registry from which all 198 personal identifiers have been removed or obscured to protect 199 patient privacy. 200 (b)âThe department shall enter into a written contract with 201 eligible facilities which specifies the scope of services 202 provided, the service level, the duration of the agreement, the 203 responsible parties, and the service costs. Failure to meet the 204 contract requirements may result in the filing of an action by 205 the department and a temporary suspension of reimbursement for 206 the prescription or administration of experimental treatment 207 pursuant to subsection (8). 208 (c)âThe department shall annually publish a public report 209 of experimental treatment outcomes and safety signals in the 210 aggregate. 211 (7)(a)âA health insurer or a health maintenance 212 organization regulated under the Florida Insurance Code are 213 encouraged to provide insurance coverage for experimental 214 treatments in the same manner as any other covered treatment or 215 therapy. 216 (b)âA health insurer or a health maintenance organization 217 may not deny insurance coverage based solely on a treatment 218 being experimental or denied approval for general use by the 219 FDA. 220 (c)âThis subsection does not require insurance coverage and 221 does not expand the coverage an insurer or health maintenance 222 organization must provide under the Florida Insurance Code. 223 (8)(a)âA licensed physician or an eligible facility may 224 receive reimbursement for the prescription or administration of 225 an experimental treatment under this section. However, in order 226 to receive such reimbursement, an eligible facility must 227 actively participate in the patient registry established under 228 subsection (6). Failure to participate in the patient registry 229 may result in temporary suspension of reimbursement until 230 compliance is restored. 231 (b)1.âReimbursement for a prescribed or administered 232 experimental treatment under this subsection may not exceed a 233 discounted rate set by the department as a percentage of a 234 recognized pricing benchmark, including wholesale acquisition 235 cost or average sales price. 236 2.âThe department shall adopt rules that: 237 a.âEstablish an allowable discount band to reflect 238 evidentiary uncertainty. 239 b.âApply a registry noncompliance adjustment which 240 increases the discounted rate set by the department. 241 c.âProvide for renewal and potential adjustment of the 242 discounted rate every 2 years based on registry compliance. 243 (c)âUpon approval by the FDA of an experimental treatment, 244 the discounted rate set by the department for reimbursement 245 expires and the standard reimbursement rate applies. 246 (9)âA manufacturer of an experimental treatment shall 247 provide for a temporary price concession, which price must be 248 set by the department by rule as a percentage of a recognized 249 pricing benchmark. The temporary price concession expires upon 250 approval by the FDA of the experimental treatment. 251 (10)âAn eligible facility or manufacturer and the 252 Department of Management Services pursuant to s. 110.123 may 253 enter into a healthcare contract under which a portion of 254 payment is linked to experimental treatment outcomes. The 255 department shall adopt a rule for such contract, which rule must 256 provide for standard contract terms and authorize reconciliation 257 intervals not to exceed 2 years. 258 (11)(a)âThe department shall adopt by rule procedures for 259 licensing experimental treatment centers and shall approve or 260 deny a completed application within 90 days. 261 (b)âThe department shall establish by rule the following 262 minimum procedural and operational standards: 263 1.âWritten policies and procedures. 264 2.âOversight and governance standards. 265 3.âInspection and safety standards. 266 4.âStaff training provisions. 267 5.âRecordkeeping provisions. 268 6.âData quality assurance. 269 (12)(a)âA licensing board may not revoke, deny renewal, 270 suspend, or take any action against a physicianâs license issued 271 under chapter 458 or chapter 459 based solely on the physicianâs 272 recommendations to an eligible patient regarding access to or 273 treatment with experimental treatment authorized under this 274 section. A state agency responsible for Medicare certification 275 may not take action against a physicianâs Medicare certification 276 based solely on the physicianâs recommendation that an eligible 277 patient have access to experimental treatment. 278 (b)1.âThis section does not create a private cause of 279 action: 280 a.âAgainst a manufacturer of an experimental treatment; 281 b.âAgainst a person or an entity involved in the care of an 282 eligible patient who is using an experimental treatment; or 283 c.âFor any harm to the eligible patient that is a result of 284 the use of an experimental treatment, 285 286 if the manufacturer or other person or entity complies in good 287 faith with the terms of this section and exercises reasonable 288 care. 289 2.âThis paragraph does not apply to judicial action brought 290 for gross negligence or intentional, willful, or wanton 291 misconduct. 292 (c)âIf an eligible patient dies while using experimental 293 treatment pursuant to this section, the patientâs heirs are not 294 liable for any outstanding debt related to the patientâs use of 295 such treatment. 296 (d)âA hospital or licensed health care facility is not 297 required to provide new or additional health care services or 298 treatments under this section without prior consent of the 299 hospital or licensed health care facility. Participation 300 pursuant to this section is entirely voluntary at all times. 301 (e)âA public official, a public employee, or an agent of 302 this state, or any political subdivision thereof, may not deny 303 or attempt to deny access to experimental treatment under this 304 section. Counseling, advice, or recommendations by a licensed 305 physician consistent with the standard of care do not constitute 306 the denial of access or the attempted denial of access to 307 experimental treatment under this paragraph. 308 (13)âThis section does not authorize the possession, use, 309 dispensing, or administration of a controlled substance in 310 violation of chapter 893, except to the extent expressly 311 permitted by state or federal law. 312 (14)âThe department shall adopt rules pursuant to ss. 313 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement this section. 314 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.